Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.045

Commission authority—Interference with the legislature's core function prohibited.

(1) As provided by this chapter, the commission or the court shall determine all questions described by this chapter as under the commission's authority. However, such authority may not result in an order or rule that intrudes upon or interferes with the legislature's core function of efficient and effective law making or the essential operation of the legislature, including that an order or rule may not:

(a) Modify any matter relating to the qualifications and elections of members of the legislature, or the holding of office of members of the legislature;

(b) Modify any matter relating to the legislature or each house thereof choosing its officers, adopting rules for its proceedings, selecting committees necessary for the conduct of business, considering or enacting legislation, or otherwise exercising the legislative power of this state;

(c) Modify any matter relating to legislative calendars, schedules, and deadlines of the legislature; or

(d) Modify laws, rules, policies, or procedures regarding ethics or conflicts of interest.

(2) No member of the legislature may be compelled by subpoena or other means to attend a proceeding related to matters covered by this chapter during a legislative session, committee assembly days, or for 15 days before commencement of each session.

[ 2024 c 333 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.